Hawaii statutes.
[§432C-6] For-profit entity; after
conversion. After conversion, the for-profit entity shall not be subject
to this chapter, but if a stock insurance company, shall be in conformance with
title 24. [L 1998, c 260, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next